Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.090

Subpoena power and examination under oath.

The director shall have the power to subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, require the production of evidence, administer oaths, and examine any person under oath in connection with any subject related to a duty imposed or a power vested in the director.

[ 2014 c 37 s 342.]